pt-PT: Material da fita de prémio: Acetato; Algodão; Nylon; Poliéster; Cetim; Seda; Veludo; Outros
zh-TW: 絲帶獎章材質: 醋酸纖維; 棉; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 緞面; 絲綢; 天鵝絨; 其他
fr: Matière du ruban de récompense: Acétate; Coton; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Soie; Velours; Autre
it: Materiale per nastri premio: Acetato; Cotone; Nylon; Poliestere; Raso; Seta; Velluto; Altro
nl: Awardlint materiaal: Acetaat; Katoen; Nylon; Polyester; Satijn; Zijde; Fluweel; Overige
th: วัสดุริบบิ้นรางวัล: อะซิเตต; ผ้าฝ้าย; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ผ้าซาติน; ผ้าไหม; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; อื่นๆ
ko: 상장/상패 리본 재질: 아세테이트; 면; 나일론; 폴리에스터; 새틴; 실크; 벨벳; 기타
zh-CN: 获奖丝带材质: 醋酸纤维; 棉质; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 缎面; 丝绸; 天鹅绒; 其他
nb: Materiale for premiebånd: Acetat; Bomull; Nylon; Polyester; Sateng; Silke; Fløyel; Annet
pl: Materiał wstążki nagrody: Acetat; Bawełna; Nylon; Poliester; Satyna; Jedwab; Aksamit; Inne
fi: Palkintonauhan materiaali: Asetaatti; Puuvilla; Nailon; Polyesteri; Satiini; Silkki; Sametti; Muu
de: Material für Auszeichnungsbänder: Acetat; Baumwolle; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Seide; Samt; Sonstige
el: Υλικό κορδέλας βραβείων: Ασετάτ; Βαμβάκι; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Σατέν; Μετάξι; Βελούδο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Material za nagradni trak: Acetat; Bombaž; Najlon; Poliester; Saten; Svila; Žamet; Drugo
pt-BR: Material da fita de premiação: Acetato; Algodão; Nylon; Poliéster; Cetim; Seda; Veludo; Outro
lt-LT: Apdovanojimų juostelės medžiaga: Acetatas; Medvilnė; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Satinas; Šilkas; Aksomas; Kita
da: Materiale til præmiebånd: Acetat; Bomuld; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Silke; Velour; Andet
vi: Chất liệu ruy băng giải thưởng: Axetat; Cotton; Nilon; Polyester; Satin; Lụa; Nhung; Khác
en: Award ribbon material: Acetate; Cotton; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Silk; Velvet; Other
sv: Material för rosett: Acetat; Bomull; Nylon; Polyester; Satin; Siden; Sammet; Annat
sk-SK: Materiál kokardy: Acetát; Bavlna; Nylón; Polyester; Satén; Hodváb; Zamat; Iné
es: Material del listón del premio: Acetato; Algodón; Nailon; Poliéster; Satén; Seda; Terciopelo; Otro
ja: 賞品リボン素材: アセテート; コットン; ナイロン; ポリエステル; サテン; シルク; ベルベット; その他
cs: Materiál stuhy pro ocenění: Acetát; Bavlna; Nylon; Polyester; Satén; Hedvábí; Samet; Ostatní
hr-HR: Materijal nagradne vrpce: Acetat; Pamuk; Najlon; Poliester; Saten; Svila; Baršun; Ostalo
tr: Ödül kurdelesi malzemesi: Asetat; Pamuk; Naylon; Polyester; Saten; İpek; Kadife; Diğer
hu: Díjszalag anyaga: Acetát; Pamut; Nejlon; Poliészter; Szatén; Selyem; Bársony; Egyéb
ro-RO: Materialul panglicii certificatului: Acetat; Bumbac; Nailon; Poliester; Satin; Mătase; Catifea; Altele
ru: Материал наградной ленты: Ацетат; Хлопок; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Атлас; Шелк; Бархат; Другое
bg-BG: Материал за панделка за награди: Ацетат; Памук; Найлон; Полиестер; Сатен; Коприна; Кадифе; Друго